src/fst/morphology/affixes/numerals.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ############################## !
!! # Meänkieli numerals 
! ############################## !

!! From fin via fkv.


!! # Numeral inflection
!! Numeral inflection is like nominal, except that numerals compound in all
!! forms which requires great amount of care in the inflection patterns.
! FIXME: compounding

! nominatives
LEXICON NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE
!!€gt-norm: Numeral nominative back
!!€ kaksi: kaksi+Num+Sg+Nom # two
!!€ kaks: kaksi+Num+Sg+Nom
+Sg+Nom:0   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_NOMINATIVE
!!€gt-norm: Numeral nominative front
!!€ yksi: yksi+Num+Sg+Nom # one
!!€ yks: yksi+Num+Sg+Nom # one
+Sg+Nom:0   NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT
!!€gt-norm: Numeral nominative plural back
!!€ kahet: kaksi+Num+Pl+Nom
+Pl+Nom:%>t     NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT
!!€gt-norm: Numeral nominative plural front
!!€ yhet: yksi+Num+Pl+Nom
+Pl+Nom:%>t     NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

! basic cases
LEXICON NUM_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS
!!€gt-norm: Numeral weak singular back
!!€ kahen: kaksi+Num+Sg+Gen
!!€ kahela: kaksi+Num+Sg+Ade
!!€ kahelta: kaksi+Num+Sg+Abl
!!€ kahele: kaksi+Num+Sg+All
!!€ kahessa: kaksi+Num+Sg+Ine
!!€ kahesta: kaksi+Num+Sg+Ela
!!€ kaheksi: kaksi+Num+Sg+Tra
!!€ kahetta: kaksi+Num+Sg+Abe
0    NUM_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT   ;
+Sg+Gen:%>n     NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
+Sg+Abe:%>tta   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
+Sg+Abl:%>lta   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
!+Sg+Ade:%>la   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
!+Sg+All:%>le   NUM_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT      ;
!+Sg+Ade+Err/Orth:%>lla   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
!+Sg+All+Err/Orth:%>lle   NUM_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT      ;
+Sg+Ela:%>sta   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
+Sg+Ine:%>ssa   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
+Sg+Tra:%>kse   NUM_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL       ;
+Sg+Tra:%>ksi   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
+Sg+Tra:%>ksi   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_SINGULARS_L
+Sg+Ade:%>la   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
+Sg+All:%>le   NUM_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_SINGULARS_LL
+Sg+Ade:%>lla   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
+Sg+All:%>lle   NUM_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS
!!€gt-norm: Numeral weak singular front
!!€ yhen: yksi+Num+Sg+Gen
!!€ yhelä: yksi+Num+Sg+Ade
!!€ yheltä: yksi+Num+Sg+Abl
!!€ yhele: yksi+Num+Sg+All
!!€ yhessä: yksi+Num+Sg+Ine
!!€ yhestä: yksi+Num+Sg+Ela
!!€ yheksi: yksi+Num+Sg+Tra
!!€ yhettä: yksi+Num+Sg+Abe
0    NUM_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT   ;
+Sg+Gen:%>n     NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT   ;
+Sg+Abe:%>ttä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
+Sg+Abl:%>ltä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
!+Sg+Ade:%>lä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
!+Sg+All:%>le   NUM_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT      ;
!+Sg+Ade+Err/Orth:%>llä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
!+Sg+All+Err/Orth:%>lle   NUM_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT      ;
+Sg+Ela:%>stä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
+Sg+Ine:%>ssä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
+Sg+Tra:%>kse   NUM_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL       ;
+Sg+Tra:%>ksi   NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
+Sg+Tra:%>ksi   NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_SINGULARS_L
+Sg+Ade:%>lä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
+Sg+All:%>le   NUM_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_SINGULARS_LL
+Sg+Ade:%>llä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
+Sg+All:%>lle   NUM_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS
!!€gt-norm: Numeral strong singular back
!!€ kahtena: kaksi+Num+Sg+Ess
!+Sg+Ess:%>na NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
+Sg+Nom:0  NUM_BACK_POSS   ;
+Sg+Gen:0  NUM_BACK_POSS   ;
+Pl+Nom:0  NUM_BACK_POSS   ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS_NA
+Sg+Ess:%>na NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS_NNA
+Sg+Ess:%>nna NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS
!!€gt-norm: Numeral strong singular front
!!€ yhtenä: yksi+Num+Sg+Ess
!+Sg+Ess:%>nä NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
+Sg+Nom:0  NUM_FRONT_POSS   ;
+Sg+Gen:0  NUM_FRONT_POSS   ;
+Pl+Nom:0  NUM_FRONT_POSS   ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS_NA
+Sg+Ess:%>nä NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS_NNA
+Sg+Ess:%>nnä NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS
!!€gt-norm: Numeral weak plural back
!!€ kaksila: kaksi+Num+Pl+Ade
!!€ kaksilta: kaksi+Num+Pl+Abl
!!€ kaksile: kaksi+Num+Pl+All
!!€ kaksissa: kaksi+Num+Pl+Ine
!!€ kaksista: kaksi+Num+Pl+Ela
!!€ kaksiksi: kaksi+Num+Pl+Tra
!!€ kaksitta: kaksi+Num+Pl+Abe
+Pl+Abe:%>i%>tta   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
+Pl+Abl:%>i%>lta   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
!+Pl+Ade:%>i%>la   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
!+Pl+All:%>i%>le  NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
!+Pl+Ade+Err/Orth:%>i%>lla   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
!+Pl+All+Err/Orth:%>i%>lle  NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
+Pl+Ela:%>i%>sta   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
+Pl+Ine:%>i%>ssa   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
+Pl+Ins:%>i%>n    NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
+Pl+Tra:%>i%>kse  NUM_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL        ;
+Pl+Tra:%>i%>ksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS_L
+Pl+Ade:%>i%>la   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
+Pl+All:%>i%>le  NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS_LL
+Pl+Ade:%>i%>lla   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
+Pl+All:%>i%>lle  NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS
!!€gt-norm: Numeral weak plural front
!!€ yksilä: yksi+Num+Pl+Ade
!!€ yksiltä: yksi+Num+Pl+Abl
!!€ yksile: yksi+Num+Pl+All
!!€ yksissä: yksi+Num+Pl+Ine
!!€ yksistä: yksi+Num+Pl+Ela
!!€ yksiksi: yksi+Num+Pl+Tra
!!€ yksittä: yksi+Num+Pl+Abe
+Pl+Abe:%>i%>ttä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
+Pl+Abl:%>i%>ltä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
!+Pl+Ade:%>i%>lä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
!+Pl+All:%>i%>le  NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
!+Pl+Ade+Err/Orth:%>i%>llä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
!+Pl+All+Err/Orth:%>i%>lle  NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
+Pl+Ela:%>i%>stä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
+Pl+Ine:%>i%>ssä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
+Pl+Ins:%>i%>n    NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
+Pl+Tra:%>i%>kse  NUM_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL        ;
+Pl+Tra:%>i%>ksi  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS_L
+Pl+Ade:%>i%>lä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
+Pl+All:%>i%>le  NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS_LL
+Pl+Ade:%>i%>llä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
+Pl+All:%>i%>lle  NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS_N
!!€gt-norm: Numeral weak plural back strong
!!€ kaksina: kaksi+Num+Pl+Ess
!!€ kaksine: kaksi+Num+Pl+Com
+Pl+Ess:%>i%>nä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
+Pl+Com:%>i%>ne        NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS_NN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral weak plural back strong
!!€ kaksina: kaksi+Num+Pl+Ess
!!€ kaksine: kaksi+Num+Pl+Com
+Pl+Ess:%>i%>nnä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
+Pl+Com:%>i%>nne        NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ; ! Pituusreekeli on voimassa myös komitatiivissa

LEXICON NUM_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS_N
!!€gt-norm: Numeral weak plural front strong
!!€ yksinä: yksi+Num+Pl+Ess
!!€ yksine: yksi+Num+Pl+Com
+Pl+Ess:^Por%>i%>na   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
+Pl+Com:^Por%>i%>ne   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS_NN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral weak plural front strong
!!€ yksinä: yksi+Num+Pl+Ess
!!€ yksine: yksi+Num+Pl+Com
+Pl+Ess:%>i%>nna   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
+Pl+Com:%>i%>nne   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;  ! Pituusreekeli on voimassa myös komitatiivissa



! allomorphs
LEXICON NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_A
!!€gt-norm: Numeral singular partitive a
!!€ kaheksee: kaheksen+Num+Sg+Par !eight
+Sg+Par:%>a      NUM_BACK_POSS_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_E
+Sg+Par:%>e      NUM_BACK_POSS_OPT      ;

!LEXICON NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral singular partitive a poss aan
!!€ kolmee: kolme+Num+Sg+Par !three
!+Sg+Par:%>a      NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA
!!€gt-norm: Numeral singular partitive ta
!!€ kuutta: kuusi+Num+Sg+Par !six
+Sg+Par:%>ta     NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ
!!€gt-norm: Numeral singular partitive tä
!!€ viittä: viisi+Num+Sg+Par !five
+Sg+Par:%>tä     NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;


LEXICON NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_E
+Sg+Par:%>e      NUM_FRONT_POSS_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral singular illative an
!!€ kaheksheen: kaheksen+Num+Sg+Ill
+Sg+Ill:%>an     #         ;
+Sg+Ill:%>a      NUM_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_HEEN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral singular illative en back
!!€ kolmheen: kolme+Num+Sg+Ill
+Sg+Ill:%>he%>en    #     ;
+Sg+Ill:e^HMET2%>he%>en    #     ;
+Sg+Ill:%>he%>e     NUM_BACK_POSS     ;
+Sg+Ill:e^HMET2%>he%>e     NUM_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HEEN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral singular illative en front
!!€ viitheen: viisi+Num+Sg+Ill
+Sg+Ill:%>he%>en    #     ;
+Sg+Ill:%>he%>e     NUM_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HÄÄN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral singular illative en front
!!€ neljään: neljä+Num+Sg+Ill
+Sg+Ill:%>hä%>än    #     ;
+Sg+Ill:%>hä%>ä     NUM_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral singular illative in back
!!€ miljardhiin: miljardi+Num+Sg+Ill !billion
+Sg+Ill:%>in     #         ;
+Sg+Ill:%>i      NUM_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_II_Sg
+Sg+Par:%>i%>i    NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_HIIN_Sg
+Sg+Ill:%>hi%>in    #     ;
+Sg+Ill:%>hi%>i     NUM_BACK_POSS     ;

!LEXICON NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA
!!€gt-norm: Numeral plural partitive ia
!!€ kaksii: kaksi+Num+Pl+Par
!+Pl+Par:%>i%>a    NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_II
+Pl+Par:%>i%>i    NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_III
+Pl+Par:%>i%>i%>t%>a    NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_OI
+Pl+Par:%>i    NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;


LEXICON NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_II
+Pl+Par:%>i%>i    NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_III
+Pl+Par:%>i%>i%>t%>ä    NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;


LEXICON NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA
!!€gt-norm: Numeral plural partitive ja
!!€ miljardii: miljardi+Num+Pl+Par
+Pl+Par:%>j%>a     NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral plural genitive ien back
!!€ kaksiin: kaksi+Num+Pl+Gen
+Pl+Gen:%>i%>en   #     ;
+Pl+Gen:%>i%>e    NUM_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IIN
+Pl+Gen:%>i%>in   #     ;
+Pl+Gen:%>i%>i    NUM_BACK_POSS     ;


LEXICON NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IIN
+Pl+Gen:%>i%>in   #     ;
+Pl+Gen:%>i%>i    NUM_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IITTEN
+Pl+Gen:%>i%>itten   #     ;
+Pl+Gen:%>i%>i    NUM_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IITTEN
+Pl+Gen:%>i%>itten   #     ;
+Pl+Gen:%>i%>i    NUM_BACK_POSS     ;

!LEXICON NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN
!+Pl+Gen:%>j%>en    #     ;
!+Pl+Gen:%>j%>e     NUM_BACK_POSS     ;

!LEXICON NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IN
!+Pl+Gen:%>i%>n    #     ;
!+Pl+Gen:%>i     NUM_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral plural genitive ten back
!!€ kuussiin: kuusi+Num+Pl+Gen
!!€ kuutten: kuusi+Num+Pl+Gen !kuussiin on tärkeämpi
+Pl+Gen:%>ten    #     ;
+Pl+Gen:%>te     NUM_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral plural genitive ten front
!!€ viissiin: viisi+Num+Pl+Gen 
!!€ viitten: viisi+Num+Pl+Gen !viissiin on tärkeämpi
+Pl+Gen:%>ten    #     ;
+Pl+Gen:%>te     NUM_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral plural genitive in back
+Pl+Gen:%>in    #     ;
+Pl+Gen:%>i     NUM_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral plural genitive in front
+Pl+Gen:%>in    #     ;
+Pl+Gen:%>i     NUM_FRONT_POSS     ;
